Utah statutes.
35A-4-313.   Determination of employer and employment.
The division or its authorized representatives may, upon its own motion or
upon application of an employing unit, determine whether an employing unit
constitutes an employer and whether services performed for, or in connection
with the business of, an employer constitute employment for the employing
unit.  The determinations may constitute the basis for determination of
contribution liability under Subsection 35A-4-305(2) and be subject to review
and appeal as provided.
